apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
    <pardef n="petsto__num">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>timi</l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>timi</l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>timi</l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tim</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tim</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tim</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pogodu/_part">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pravzaprav/_part">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="predvsem/_part">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   

    <pardef n="sedemsto__num">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>timi</l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>timi</l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>timi</l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tim</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tim</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tim</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sicer/_part">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="skorajda/_part">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sploh/_part">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="part"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s__pr">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="šeststo__num">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tih</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>timi</l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>timi</l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>timi</l>      <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tim</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tim</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>tim</l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="blizu">           <i>blizu</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="od">              <i>od</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="o">               <i>o</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="okoli">           <i>okoli</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="okrog">           <i>okrog</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="okrog">           <i>okrog</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="onstran">         <i>onstran</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="pod">             <i>pod</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="po">              <i>po</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="po">              <i>po</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="po">              <i>po</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="poleg">           <i>poleg</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="povrhu">          <i>povrhu</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="pred">            <i>pred</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="preko">           <i>preko</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="pri">             <i>pri</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="proti">           <i>proti</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="s">               <i>s</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="skozi">           <i>skozi</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="skoz">            <i>skoz</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="skoz">            <i>skoz</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="spričo">          <i>spričo</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="sredi">           <i>sredi</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="v">               <i>v</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="vpričo">          <i>vpričo</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="vrhu">            <i>vrhu</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="vzdolž">          <i>vzdolž</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="za">              <i>za</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="za">              <i>za</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="zaradi">          <i>zaradi</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="z">               <i>z</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="razen">           <i>razen</i><par n="s__pr"/></e>
